Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 9. Violations and Penalties

§ 1091.
Negligent operation; grossly negligent operation.

Negligent operation.

A person who operates a motor vehicle on a public highway in a negligent manner shall be guilty of negligent operation.

The standard for a conviction for negligent operation in violation of this subsection shall be ordinary negligence, examining whether the person breached a duty to exercise ordinary care.

A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both. If the person has been previously convicted of a violation of this subsection, the person shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $3,000.00, or both. If serious bodily injury to or death of any person other than the operator results, the operator shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than two years or to a fine of not more than $3,000.00, or both. If serious bodily injury or death results to more than one person other than the operator, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this subdivision for each decedent or person injured.

Grossly negligent operation.

A person who operates a motor vehicle on a public highway in a grossly negligent manner shall be guilty of grossly negligent operation.

The standard for a conviction for grossly negligent operation in violation of this subsection shall be gross negligence, examining whether the person engaged in conduct that involved a gross deviation from the care that a reasonable person would have exercised in that situation.

A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. If the person has previously been convicted of a violation of this section, the person shall be imprisoned not more than four years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both. If serious bodily injury to or death of any person other than the operator results, the operator shall be imprisoned for not more than 15 years or fined not more than $15,000.00, or both. If serious bodily injury or death results to more than one person other than the operator, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this subdivision for each decedent or person injured.

Prosecution for manslaughter. The provisions of this section do not limit or restrict the prosecution for manslaughter.

Surcharge. A person convicted of violating subsection (b) of this section shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to be credited to the DUI Enforcement Fund. The collection procedures described in

13 V.S.A. § 5240

shall be utilized in the collection of this surcharge.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1981, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 55

, § 16;

1995, No. 21

, § 4;

1995, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 179.

§ 1092.
Damaging surface of road.

No person may operate or move upon or over any highway or bridge a vehicle, machine, or contrivance which has any flange, ribs, clamps, or other object attached to or made a part of, its wheels which will injure, cut into, or destroy the surface of the highway or bridge to any appreciable extent.
This provision does not restrict the right of any person to use tires which are equipped with “studs” or “cleats,” so-called, of a type designed for general use to facilitate travel in winter.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1093.
Smoke screen device.

No person may operate, or permit to be operated, a motor vehicle that is equipped with any special device or contrivance, subject to the control of the operator, designed to give off a smoke screen, so-called, or designed to impede or hinder any law enforcement officer, in the discharge of his or her duties.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1094.
Operation without consent of owner; aggravated operation without consent of owner.

A person commits the crime of operation without consent of the owner if the person, without the consent of the owner, knowingly takes, obtains, operates, uses, or continues to operate the motor vehicle of another.

A person commits the crime of aggravated operation without consent of the owner if the person, without the consent of the owner, knowingly takes, obtains, operates, uses, or continues to operate the motor vehicle of another, and:

the motor vehicle is not recovered within 24 hours of the time it is determined the theft occurred regardless of whether the operator is then in actual or constructive possession of the vehicle; or

the motor vehicle sustains $500.00 or more in damage during the commission of the offense; or

the person does any of the following:

attempts to alter or disguise or alters or disguises the appearance of the motor vehicle;

attempts to alter or remove or alters or removes the vehicle identification number as defined in subdivision 2001(3) of this title;

uses the motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;

causes bodily injury to another while operating or exercising control of the motor vehicle;

abandons the motor vehicle outside the State of Vermont; or

unlawfully attaches or otherwise displays in or upon the motor vehicle registration plates other than those officially issued for the motor vehicle.

A person convicted under subsection (a) of this section of operation without consent of the owner shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

A person convicted under subsection (b) of this section of aggravated operation without consent of the owner shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.

This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions for grand larceny.

A person convicted of violating this section shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to be credited to the DUI Enforcement Fund. The collection procedures described in

13 V.S.A. § 5240

shall be utilized in the collection of this surcharge.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.) § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1973, No. 109

, § 9, eff. May 25, 1973;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1999, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1095.
Entertainment picture visible to the operator.

A person shall not operate upon a highway in this State a moving motor vehicle carrying or having installed a screen or other device transmitting a moving entertainment picture that is visible to the operator.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1987, No. 112

, § 10;

2005, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 20, 2006;

2011, No. 25

, § 1, eff. May 11, 2011.

§ 1095a.
Junior operator use of portable electronic devices.

An individual under 18 years of age shall not use any portable electronic device as defined in subdivision 4(82) of this title while operating a moving motor vehicle in a place open temporarily or permanently to public or general circulation of vehicles.

In addition, an individual under 18 years of age shall not use any portable electronic device while operating a motor vehicle on a public highway, including while the vehicle is stationary, unless otherwise provided in this section. As used in this subsection:

“Public highway” means a State or municipal highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1(12)

.

“Operating” means operating a motor vehicle on a public highway, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device, or other temporary delays. “Operating” does not include operating a motor vehicle with or without the motor running when the operator has moved the vehicle to the side of or off the public highway and has halted in a location where the vehicle can safely and lawfully remain stationary.

The prohibitions of this section shall not apply when use of a portable electronic device is necessary for an individual to communicate with law enforcement or emergency service personnel under emergency circumstances.

An individual who violates this section commits a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100.00 and not more than $200.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $250.00 and not more than $500.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period.
(d) (1) An individual who violates this section commits a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100.00 and not more than $200.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $250.00 and not more than $500.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period.

An individual convicted of violating this section while operating within the following areas shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $200.00 and not more than $400.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $500.00 and not more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period and shall have four points assessed against his or her driving record for a first violation and five points assessed for a second or subsequent violation:

a properly designated work zone in which construction, maintenance, or utility personnel are present; or

a school zone marked with warning signs conforming to the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

An individual convicted of violating this section outside the areas designated in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall have two points assessed against his or her driving record.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 1, 2010; amended

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. Oct. 1, 2014;

2015, No. 50

, § 11;

2019, No. 59

, § 26;

2019, No. 60

, § 28;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 1095b.
Handheld use of portable electronic device prohibited.

Definition. As used in this section, “hands-free use” means the use of a portable electronic device without use of either hand by employing an internal feature of, or an attachment to, the device.

Use of handheld portable electronic device prohibited.

An individual shall not use a portable electronic device while operating a moving motor vehicle in a place open temporarily or permanently to public or general circulation of vehicles.

In addition, an individual shall not use a portable electronic device while operating a motor vehicle on a public highway in Vermont, including while the vehicle is stationary, unless otherwise provided in this section. As used in this subdivision (b)(2):

“Public highway” means a State or municipal highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1(12)

.

“Operating” means operating a motor vehicle on a public highway, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device, or other temporary delays. “Operating” does not include operating a motor vehicle with or without the motor running when the operator has moved the vehicle to the side of or off the public highway and has halted in a location where the vehicle can safely and lawfully remain stationary.

The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply:

To hands-free use.

To activation or deactivation of hands-free use, as long as any accessory for securely mounting the device is not affixed to the windshield in violation of section 1125 of this title.

When use of a portable electronic device is necessary for an individual to communicate with law enforcement or emergency service personnel under emergency circumstances.

To use of an ignition interlock device, as defined in section 1200 of this title.

To use of a global positioning or navigation system if it is installed by the manufacturer or securely mounted in the vehicle in a manner that does not violate section 1125 of this title. As used in this subdivision (b)(3)(E), “securely mounted” means the device is placed in an accessory or location in the vehicle, other than the operator’s hands, where the device will remain stationary under typical driving conditions.

Penalties.

An individual who violates this section commits a traffic violation and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100.00 and not more than $200.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $250.00 and not more than $500.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period.

An individual convicted of violating this section while operating within the following areas shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $200.00 and not more than $400.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $500.00 and not more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period and shall have four points assessed against his or her driving record for a first conviction and five points assessed for a second or subsequent conviction:

a properly designated work zone in which construction, maintenance, or utility personnel are present; or

a school zone marked with warning signs conforming to the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

An individual convicted of violating this section outside the areas designated in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall have two points assessed against his or her driving record.

Commercial motor vehicles.

Operators of commercial motor vehicles shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 39 of this title (Commercial Driver’s License Act) instead of the provisions of this chapter with respect to the handheld use of mobile telephones and texting while operating a commercial motor vehicle.

An individual shall not be issued more than one complaint for any violation of this section, section 1095a of this title (junior operator use of portable electronic devices), or section 1099 of this title (texting prohibited) that arises from the same incident.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 57

, § 26, eff. Jan. 1, 2014; amended

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 40, eff. Oct. 1, 2014;

2015, No. 50

, § 12;

2017, No. 71

, § 12;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 180;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 1096.
General penalties.

Any person who violates the speed restrictions of subsection 1083(b) of this title shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $50.00 and is liable for damages for injuries thereby done to the bridge or structure, which may be recovered in a civil action brought under this section in the name and for the benefit of the State or municipal corporation liable for the repairs of the bridge or structure, with costs.

A parent or guardian who knowingly permits a child under 16 years of age, in his or her custody, to violate any provision of sections 1136 through 1141, inclusive, of this title shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $25.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 181.

§ 1097.
Excessive speed.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle on a public highway at a speed of 60 miles per hour or more and at least 30 miles per hour in excess of a State speed zone or local speed limit.
A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned upon a first conviction not more than three months or fined not more than $300.00, or both; and upon a second conviction shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 109

, § 5, eff. July 1, 1990.

§ 1098.
Disposition of pending cases.

The Judicial Bureau shall enter judgment against the defendant in all cases in which:

prior to January 1, 2007, the defendant filed an answer admitting or not contesting the violation;

the defendant paid all or a portion of the fine, penalty, or surcharge; and

the issuing officer did not file the original complaint prior to July 1, 2007.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, with respect to any judgment entered pursuant to this section, the Judicial Bureau shall immediately seal the record and shall not report the judgment to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. Any funds received by the Judicial Bureau for judgments under this section shall be deposited in the Court Technology Special Fund up to $150,000.00, and the balance to be deposited to the Municipal Ticket Repayment Revolving Fund defined in

4 V.S.A. § 28

.

The Judicial Bureau shall dismiss the action in all cases in which:

the defendant filed an answer denying or contesting the violation prior to January 1, 2007; and

the issuing officer did not file the original complaint prior to July 1, 2007.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 51

, § 17.

§ 1099.
Texting prohibited.

As used in this section, “texting” means the reading or the manual composing or sending of electronic communications, including text messages, instant messages, or e-mails, using a portable electronic device as defined in subdivision 4(82) of this title. Use of a global positioning or navigation system shall be governed by section 1095b of this title.

An individual shall not engage in texting while operating a moving motor vehicle in a place open temporarily or permanently to public or general circulation of vehicles.
(b) (1) An individual shall not engage in texting while operating a moving motor vehicle in a place open temporarily or permanently to public or general circulation of vehicles.

In addition, an individual shall not engage in texting while operating a motor vehicle on a public highway in Vermont, including while the vehicle is stationary, unless otherwise provided under this section. As used in this subdivision (b)(2):

“Public highway” means a State or municipal highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1(12)

.

“Operating” means operating a motor vehicle on a public highway, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device, or other temporary delays. “Operating” does not include operating a motor vehicle with or without the motor running when the operator has moved the vehicle to the side of or off the public highway and has halted in a location where the vehicle can safely and lawfully remain stationary.

An individual who violates this section commits a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100.00 and not more than $200.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $250.00 and not more than $500.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period.
(c) (1) An individual who violates this section commits a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100.00 and not more than $200.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $250.00 and not more than $500.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period.

An individual convicted of violating this section while operating within the following areas shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $200.00 and not more than $400.00 for a first violation, and of not less than $500.00 and not more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent violation within any two-year period and shall have four points assessed against his or her driving record for a first conviction and five points assessed for a second or subsequent conviction:

a properly designated work zone in which construction, maintenance, or utility personnel are present; or

a school zone marked with warning signs conforming to the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

An individual convicted of violating this section outside the areas designated in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall have two points assessed against his or her driving record.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 1, 2010; amended

2013, No. 57

, § 24;

2015, No. 50

, § 13;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 34.